Utah statutes.
23-14-2.6.   Regional advisory councils -- Creation -- Membership -- Duties -- Per diem and expenses.

(1)  There are created five regional advisory councils which shall consist of 12 to 15 members each from the wildlife region whose boundaries are established for administrative purposes by the division.

(2)  The members shall include individuals who represent the following groups and interests:

(a)  agriculture;

(b)  sportsmen;

(c)  nonconsumptive wildlife;

(d)  locally elected public officials;

(e)  federal land agencies; and

(f)  the public at large.

(3)  The executive director of the Department of Natural Resources, in consultation with the director of the Division of Wildlife Resources, shall select the members from a list of nominees submitted by the respective interest group or agency.

(4)  The councils shall:

(a)  hear broad input, including recommendations, biological data, and information regarding the effects of wildlife;

(b)  gather information from staff, the public, and government agencies; and

(c)  make recommendations to the Wildlife Board in an advisory capacity.

(5) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (5)(b), each member shall serve a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (5)(a), the executive director shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.

(6)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(7)  The councils shall determine:

(a)  the time and place of meetings; and

(b)  any other procedural matter not specified in this chapter.

(8)  Members of the councils shall complete an orientation course as provided in Subsection 23-14-2(8).

(9)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

